Wyoming, session 2026, SF0051.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-1-302(h) is amended to read:

23-1-302. Powers and duties.

(h) For purposes of promoting the maintenance of
wildlife habitat and attaining wildlife management
objectives pursuant to W.S. 23-1-103 and in addition to
duties prescribed under paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section,
SF0051

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0212
the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations
governing the issuance of elk, deer, antelope and turkey
hunting licenses to Wyoming landowners without subjection
to prescribed means of competitive public issuance. Fees
assessed for licenses authorized under this subsection
shall be equal to fees prescribed under W.S. 23-2-101(j)
for each species for which the license is issued. The
following conditions shall apply regarding the issuance of
transferable hunting licenses to resident Wyoming
landowners:

(i) Resident landowners shall qualify to use or
transfer not more than two (2) hunting licenses per
eligible species during each calendar year, if available;

(ii) To be eligible to use or transfer any
license under this subsection, resident landowners shall:

(A) Operate a farming or ranching operation
within the state;

(B) Have the farming or ranching operation
classified as agricultural land by the county assessor; and
SF0051

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0212

(C) Make a minimum annual gross income of
ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) from the sale of
agricultural commodities.

(iii) Resident landowners shall be permitted to
transfer a hunting license issued under this subsection to
any person who qualifies for a hunting license under title
23, chapter 2 of the Wyoming statutes;

(iv) This subsection is repealed June 30, 2031.

Section 2. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

SF0051

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0212
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0051